test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-86jahtjma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - jaht́ma: # Verb jaht́ma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     jaht́ma+V+Inf/mA: jaht́ma
     jaht́ma+V+Inf: jahtiq
     jaht́ma+V+Act+PrfPrc: jaht́nuq
     jaht́ma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [jahit, jahitu]

     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jahi
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [jahit, jahidõq]
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jaht́
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jahimiq
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jahitiq
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jaht́vaq
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: jahi
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [jahe, jaht́sõ]
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [jahet, jaht́sõt, jaheq, jaht́sõq, jahedõq, jaht́sõdõq]
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [jahtõ, jaht́sõ]
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [jahemiq, jaht́sõmiq]
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [jahetiq, jaht́sõtiq]
     jaht́ma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [jaheq, jahevaq, jaht́sõq, jaht́sõvaq]

     jaht́ma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jahida
     jaht́ma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jahitas

     jaht́ma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: jaht́va

     jaht́ma+V+Jus: jaht́kuq
